Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.040

Public livestock market license—Expiration—Renewal—Penalty.

(1) All public livestock market licenses provided for in this chapter expire on March 1st subsequent to the date of issue.

(2) Application for renewal of a public livestock market license shall be in writing on forms prescribed by the director, and shall include:

(a) All information under RCW 16.65.030(1) (d), (e), and (f);

(b) The gross dollar volume of business carried on, at, or through the applicant's public livestock market in the twelve-month period prior to the application for renewal of the license;

(c) Other information as the director may require by rule; and

(d) The appropriate license fee.

(3) If any person fails, refuses, or neglects to apply for a renewal of a preexisting license by March 1st, the person's license shall expire. To reinstate a license, the person shall pay a penalty of twenty-five dollars, which shall be added to the regular license fee, before the license may be reinstated by the director.

[ 2003 c 326 s 67; 1983 c 298 s 6; 1979 ex.s. c 91 s 2; 1959 c 107 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.